Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.120

Examinations—Secretary's authority—Consultation with examining authority.

The secretary in consultation with the Washington dental hygiene examining committee shall:

(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to prepare and conduct examinations for dental hygiene licensure;

(2) Require an applicant for licensure to pass an examination consisting of written and practical tests upon such subjects and of such scope as the committee determines;

(3) Set the standards for passage of the examination;

(4) Administer at least two examinations each calendar year. Additional examinations may be given as necessary; and

(5) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

[ 1995 c 198 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 52; 1989 c 202 s 4.]